Idaho, session 2026, H0621.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-3302C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3302C. PROHIBITED CONDUCT. (1) Any person obtaining a license un-
der the provisions of section 18-3302, Idaho Code, or carrying a concealed
deadly weapon pursuant to the provisions of section 18-3302(4)(f), Idaho
Code, shall not:
(1) (a) Carry a concealed weapon in the courtroom portions of a court-
house, as defined in subsection (2) of this section; in a juvenile de-
tention facility or jail; or in a public or private school, except as
provided in subsection (4)(g) of section 18-3302D, Idaho Code; provided
that this subsection shall not apply to:
(a) (i) Peace officers while acting within the scope of their em-
ployment;
(b) (ii) Security personnel while actually engaged in their em-
ployment; or
(c) (iii) Any person who is authorized to carry a weapon by a per-
son, board, or other entity having authority over the building or
facility; or
(2) (b) Provide information on the application for a permit to carry a
concealed weapon knowing the same to be untrue.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "courtroom portions of a court-
house" means the courtroom, judges' chambers, witness rooms, jury deliber-
ation rooms, attorney conference rooms, prisoner holding cells, the offices
of the court clerks, probation and parole offices, and adjoining corridors
of any court.
(3) Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after July
1, 2027.